District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Entertainment Establishment Employee Safety Amendment Act of
2025.”
Sec. 2. Section 28-5404 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (3)(C) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(b) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; or” in its
place.
(c) A new paragraph (5) is added to read as follows:
“(5) Provided that written, conspicuous notice to the public is displayed on the
door of the establishment or menu that cash payments are not accepted, to:

“(A) A retail establishment with a valid on-premises Class C or Class D
retailer license; or
“(B) A restaurant location, as that term is defined in § 25-101(43), that
operates:
“(i) 24 hours a day; or
“(ii) At 3:00 am at least 2 days a week.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).